Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7445
Wholesale drug distributor, defined.

(1) Wholesale drug distributor means any person or entity engaged in wholesale drug distribution in this state, including manufacturers, repackagers, own-label distributors, jobbers, private-label distributors, brokers, warehouses including manufacturer and distributor warehouses, chain pharmacy warehouses, and wholesale drug warehouses, wholesale medical gas distributors, independent wholesale drug traders, and retail pharmacies that engage in wholesale drug distribution in this state.

(2) Wholesale drug distributor does not include a common carrier or other person or entity hired solely to transport prescription drugs if the common carrier, person, or entity does not store, warehouse, or take legal ownership of such drugs.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7413;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 19.